Connecticut, session 2026, SB00145.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall conduct a study, in conjunction with the
Office of Aquatic Invasive Species, on the remediation of hydrilla in
state lakes. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, an
examination of the most effective methods of eliminating and
controlling hydrilla in such lakes, including, but not limited to, the
harvesting of such hydrilla and the ability to spot treat areas not
specifically authorized by a permit in an effort to prevent such areas
from enlarging. Additionally, such department shall develop protocols
for the expediting of permits to remediate hydrilla for alignment of the
issuance of such permits with the most efficacious time period and cost-
effective methodology for the treatment, remediation or harvesting of
such hydrilla by the applicable permittee.
LCO No. 831 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 145
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section